Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-1404
Grant; application; use; how awarded.

(1) A provider, an agricultural cooperative, an agronomist, or an agricultural producer may apply to the commission for a grant under the program. The application shall be made on forms prescribed by the commission.

(2) Grants shall only be used to provide:

(a) Adequate precision agriculture connectivity to on-farm structures and devices, including, but not limited to, tractors, combines, irrigation systems, livestock facilities, and farm offices;

(b) On-farm traceability solutions that satisfy food supply stakeholder demand, including blockchain;

(c) Products that improve soil health, water management tools and sensors that facilitate judicious use of water resources, and products that promote the use of water efficiency seed technologies that lower agriculture's water, carbon, and nitrate footprint; and

(d) Products that use autonomous solutions in agricultural machinery, including, but not limited to, grain carts, spreaders, precision drone scouting, and scouting robots.

(3) The commission shall award up to one-half of the available grant funds for the purpose described in subdivision (2)(a) of this section and up to one-half of the available grant funds for the purposes described in subdivisions (2)(b), (c), and (d) of this section.

Laws 2022, LB1144, § 15.